Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.140

Impounding—Owner to pay costs.

Upon claiming any animal impounded under this chapter, the owner shall pay all costs of transportation, advertising, legal proceedings, and keep of the animal, except as provided under RCW 16.04.100.

[ 1994 c 263 s 2; 1989 c 286 s 13; 1951 c 31 s 5. Formerly RCW 16.13.050.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.